Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), the
following new or  increased fees, adopted by the Department of Public Safety Standards and
Training and approved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, are approved:
(1) Alarm Monitor Private
Security Professional
Certification:............................. $ 94
(2) Armed Private Security
Professional Certification: ........ $ 110
(3) Event and Entertainment
Private Security Professional
Certification:............................. $ 94
(4) Unarmed Private Security
Professional Certification: ........ $ 94
(5) Alarm Monitor Private Security
Instructor Certification: ........... $ 130
(6) Unarmed Private Security
Instructor Certification: ........... $ 312
(7) Private Security Firearms
Instructor Certification: ........... $ 153
(8) Supervisory Manager License: .. $ 120
(9) Executive Manager License: ..... $ 400
(10) Private Security Late
Renewal Fee: ............................. $ 35
(11) Private Security Armed
Upgrade Fee: ............................. $ 45
(12) Private Security Reinstatement
Fee for Emergency
Suspensions:.............................. $ 25
(13) Private Security Entity
License Fee: .............................. $ 936
(14) Private Investigator
Enrolled House Bill 5033 (HB 5033-A) Page 1
License Fee: .............................. $ 690
(15) Private Investigator
Late Renewal Fee: .................... $ 35
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5033 (HB 5033-A) Page 2